Oklahoma, session 2025, SB408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3251 of Title 70, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. As used in this section, “institution” means:



Req. No. 1091 Page 1

1. An institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher

Education; or

2. A private institution of higher learning located within this

state and accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of Title 70 of the

Oklahoma Statutes that receives awards pursuant to Section 2604 of

Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, Oklahoma Tuition Equalization

Grants pursuant to Section 2632 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma

Statutes, or other scholarships or tuition aid funded with state

appropriations.

B. An institution, including the faculty, staff, or other

employees of the institution, shall not require an enrolled student

to take a leave of absence, withdraw from a program, or limit her

studies solely due to pregnancy. An institution, including the

faculty, staff, or other employees of the institution, shall

reasonably accommodate pregnant students so they may complete their

courses of study and research. Reasonable accommodation within the

meaning of this subsection may include, but is not limited to:

1. Allowances for the pregnant student’s health and safety,

such as allowing the student to maintain a safe distance from

hazardous substances;

2. Allowing the student to make up tests and assignments that

are missed for pregnancy-related reasons; or





Req. No. 1091 Page 2

3. Allowing a student to take a leave of absence. Reasonable

accommodations shall include the excusing of absences that are

medically necessary consistent with the laws of this state.

C. An enrolled student who chooses to take a leave of absence

because she is pregnant or has recently given birth shall be allowed

a period consistent with the policies of the institution, or a

period of six (6) additional months, whichever is longer, to prepare

for and take preliminary and qualifying examinations and an

extension of at least six (6) months toward completing the degree,

or while in candidacy for a degree, unless a longer extension is

medically necessary.

D. An enrolled student who chooses to take a leave of absence

because she is pregnant or has recently given birth shall return to

her program following a leave period of up to one academic semester,

unless there is a medical reason for a longer absence, in which case

her standing in the program shall be maintained during that period

of absence.

E. The institution shall consider the student’s requests for

housing accommodation due to her pregnancy.

F. The Office of Civil Rights Enforcement within the Office of

the Attorney General shall investigate complaints from students

alleging pregnancy discrimination in violation of this act. The

Office of Civil Rights Enforcement within the Office of the Attorney

General shall facilitate the forwarding of complaints to the U.S.

Req. No. 1091 Page 3

Depa rtment of Education’s Office for Civil Rights to investigate the

institution’s compliance with Title IX of the Education Amendments

of 1972, 20 U.S.C., Section 1681 et seq.

G. Each institution shall have a written policy for enrolled

students on pregnancy discrimination and procedures for addressing

pregnancy discrimination complaints under Title IX or this section.

A copy of this policy shall be made available to faculty, staff, and

employees in their required training. The policy shall be included

in the student handbook and the institution’s policies and

procedures and made available to all students attending the

institution.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-1-1091 EB 1/14/2025 3:51:05 PM













Req. No. 1091 Page 4